Utah statutes.
24-1-5.   No bond required in civil cases.

Any person may assert an interest in seized property or file an answer to a complaint for civil forfeiture without posting bond with respect to the property which is the subject of the seizure or forfeiture action.



Enacted by Statewide Initiative B, Nov. 7, 2000

